Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-224
Village situated in more than one county; legal notices; publication.

All notices and other publications, required by law to be published in any county in which any part of a village is situated, may be published in any legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such village, and such publication shall have the same force and effect as it would have if published in every county in which any part of such village is situated.

Laws 1893, c. 9, § 7, p. 140;

R.S.1913, § 5074;

C.S.1922, § 4246;

C.S.1929, § 17-224;

R.S.1943, § 17-224;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 90.